Washington statutes.
RCW 39.114.070

Direct or collateral attacks.

A direct or collateral attack on the designation of the increment area or the allocation of regular property tax revenues in conformance with applicable legal requirements, including this chapter, may not be commenced more than 30 days after adoption of the ordinance as required by RCW 39.114.020.

[ 2021 c 207 s 7.]